District of Columbia statutes.
4-753.07

Local rent supplement program referrals.

Notwithstanding § 4-753.05, during Fiscal Year 2015, the District of Columbia Housing Authority shall fill 75 tenant-based Rent Supplement Program vouchers, established by § 6-228, through referrals by the Department of Human Services. The referrals shall be based on special eligibility criteria established in 29 DCMR § 2557.1 , or shall consist of families currently in the Department of Human Services Permanent Supportive Housing Program who the Department determines no longer need intensive services.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D,C, Law 16-35, § 8d [8e]
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5162, 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5172 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5162 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5162 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).